Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.090

Suspension of treasurer.

Whenever an action based upon official misconduct is commenced against any county treasurer the county commissioners may suspend the treasurer from office until such suit is determined, and may appoint some person to fill the vacancy.

[ 2001 c 299 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.29.090. Prior: 1895 c 73 s 2; Code 1881 s 2749; 1863 p 554 s 12; 1854 p 428 s 12; RRS s 4124.]